District of Columbia statutes.
3-1418.01

Repealed

Development, construction, and leasing of ballpark.

Repealed.

Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-152, § 19a
as added Apr. 8, 2005, D.C. Law 15-320, § 109, 52 DCR 1757
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2082(j), 57 DCR 181
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2082(j) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2082(j) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).